toy.foma
#!/usr/bin/env foma -f

read lexc toy.lexc

eliminate flag AUX
define LexiconNoFlags;
define Lexicon LexiconNoFlags;


!==============
! MISC SYMBOLS
!==============
! "^"  morpheme boundary
! .#.  word boundary


!======
! SETS
!======

define C          [ f | g | h | k | l | m |
                    n | p | q | r | s | t |
                    v | w | y | z |
                    %{t%} | %{g%} | %{k%} ];

define Stop       [ p   | t   | k   | q   |
                    k w | q w ];

define VoicedC    [ g h w | g h |
                    v | l | z   | y | r | g | w |
                    m | n | n g | n g w ];

define UnvoicedC  [ p   | t   | k   | q   |
                    k w | q w |
                    f   | s   | h   |
                    l l | r r | g g | w h | g h h | g h h w |
                    m m | n n | n g n g   | n g n g w ];

define MultiCharC [ n g n g w |
                    n g n g   | g h h w | g h h |
                    g h w     | n g w   |
                    g g       | g h     | k w   | l l | m m |
                    n g       | n n     | r r   | q w | w h ];

define FullVowel  [ a | i | u ];
define V          [ e | FullVowel ];

define Allomorph  [ %{E%} | %{I%} | %{GI%} | %{AI%} ];


!================
! FILTERS
!
!   Description.
!================

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 1. SHORTHAND DEFINITIONS 
!
!    Description.
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

!-----------
! mood tags
!-----------
define Concessive         [ "^" ["[Conc.Intr]" | "[Cond.Trns]"] ];

define Conditional        [ "^" ["[Cond.Intr]" | "[Cond.Trns]"] ];

define Consequential      [ "^" ["[Cnsq1.Intr]" | "[Cnsq1.Trns]" | "[Cnsq2.Intr]" | "[Cnsq2.Trns]"] ];

define Contemporative     [ "^" ["[Ctmp.Intr]" | "[Ctmp.Trns]"] ];

define Indicative         [ "^" ["[Ind.Intr]" | "[Ind.Trns]"] ];

define Participial        [ "^" ["[Ptcp.Intr]" | "[Ptcp.Trns]"] ];

define ParticipialOblique [ "^" ["[PtcpObl.Intr]" | "[PtcpObl.Trns]"] ];

define Precessive         [ "^" ["[Prec.Intr]" | "[Prec.Trns]"] ];

define Subordinative      [ "^" ["[Sbrd.Intr]" | "[Sbrd.Trns]"] ];

define VolitiveOfFear     [ "^" "[Volitive.Of.Fear]" ];

define Optative [ "^" ["[Opt.Pres.Intr]"     | "[Opt.Pres.Trns]"         |
                       "[Opt.Pres.Intr.2Sg]" | "[Opt.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Sg]" |
                       "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Pl]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Pl.3Pl]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Du.3Pl]" |
                       "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Intr]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns]"     |
                       "[Opt.Fut.Intr]"      | "[Opt.Fut.Trns]"          |
                       "[Opt.Fut.Neg.Intr]"  | "[Opt.Fut.Neg.Trns]"]
                ];

!-------------------- 
! negative postbases
!-------------------- 
define Nghite   [ "^" "@" "–" {nghite} "(V→V)" ];
define Negative [ "^" [ "@" "~" ":" "(ng)" {igate} "(V→V)"    |
                        "@" {laaghigate} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {pagigate} "(V→V)"                |
                        "–" {qiigate} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "~" ":" "(ng)" {ite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "–" {pagite} "(V→V)"                  | 
                        "–" {ketiite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "–" {llgite} "(V→V)"                  |
                        "–" {llgiite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "@" "~" ":" "(i/u)" {mangite} "(V→V)" |
                        "–" {pagumangite} "(V→V)"             |
                        "@" "~f" {niite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "@" "~f" {naanghite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "–" {pagnaanghite} "(V→V)"            |
                        "@" "–" {nghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "+" {panghite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "–" {panghite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "+" {pagunghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {pagunghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {llghite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "+" {pagningite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "+" {yaghqiite} "(V→V)"               |
                        "@" "~f" "–" {yiite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "+" {yugniite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "@" "~f" {nanigh} "(V→V)"             |
                        "@" "~f" {nanighqe} "(V→V)"           ]
                ];

!-----------------
! modal postbases
!-----------------
define Kayugu     [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kayugu} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqe       [ "^" "~f" {naqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqlaatagh [ "^" "~f" {naqlaatagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Qaghnaqe   [ "^" "–" {qaghnaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Na         [ "^" "@" "~f" {na} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqngu     [ "^" "@" "~f" {naqngu} "(V→V)" ];
define Yaghqaqe   [ "^" "@" "~f" {yaghqaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Yaghqau    [ "^" "@" "~f" {yaghqau} "(V→V)" ];
define Nayagh     [ "^" "@" "~f" {nayagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Qaghnayagh [ "^" "–" {qaghnagyh} "(V→V)" ];
define ModalPostbase [ Kayugu   | Naqe        | Naqlaatagh |
                       Qaghnaqe | Na | Naqngu | Yaghqaqe   |
                       Yaghqau  | Nayagh      | Qaghnayagh ];

!---------------------
! past tense postbases
!---------------------
define Kau  [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kau}  "(V→V)" ]; 
define Kaqe [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Ma   [ "^" "@" "~" ":" "(i/u)" {ma} "(V→V)" ];
define PastTensePostbase [ Kau | Kaqe | Ma ];

!------------------------------
! progressive aspect postbases
!------------------------------
define Aqe       [ "^" "~" "(g)" {aqe} "(V→V)" ]; 
define Aqlaatagh [ "^" "~" "(g)" {aqlaatagh} "(V→V)" ];
define ProgressiveAspectPostbase [ Aqe | Aqlaatagh ];

!--------------------------------
! future / frustrative postbases
!--------------------------------
define Lleqe [ "^" "@" {lleqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Naagh [ "^" "@" "~f" {naagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Yagh  [ "^" "@" "~f" {yagh} "(V→V)" ];

!-----------------------------------
! evidential / imputative postbases
!-----------------------------------
define PeteFte [ "^" "+" "(pete)" {fte} "(V→V)" ];
define Ni      [ "^" "@" "~f" {ni} "(CmpdVbl)" ];


!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 2. CO-OCCURRENCE RESTRICTIONS 
!
!    Description.
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

!---------------------------------------------
! negative postbase co-occurence restrictions
!---------------------------------------------
define OnlyOneNeg ~[ ?* Negative ?* Nghite ?* ];

define HasLexicalizedForm ~[ ?* [Ma | Aqe | Lleqe] ?* Nghite ?* [ Concessive | Consequential | Contemporative     |
                                                                  Indicative | Participial   | ParticipialOblique |
                                                                  Precessive | Subordinative | Optative           ]
                           ];

define NegativeFilters [ OnlyOneNeg .o. HasLexicalizedForm ];

!-------------------------------------------------------------
! modal co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.116-117]
!-------------------------------------------------------------
define ModalPast              ~[ ?* ModalPostbase ?* [Kau | Kaqe] ?* |
                                 ?* [Kayugu | Yaghqau | Yaghqaqe] ?* Ma ?* ];

define ModalProgressive       ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* [Aqe | Aqlaatagh] ?* ];

define ModalFutureFrustrative ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* [Lleqe | Naagh | Yagh] ?* ];

define ModalEvidential        ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* PeteFte ?* ];

define ModalMood              ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* Subordinative ?* |
                                 ?* [Kayugu | Nayagh | Yaghqau | Yaghqaqe] ?* [Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define ModalFilters [ ModalPast .o. ModalProgressive .o. ModalFutureFrustrative .o. ModalEvidential .o. ModalMood ];

!------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.118-119]
!------------------------------------------------------------------
define PastFuture ~[ ?* PastTensePostbase ?* [Lleqe | Naagh] ?* ]; 

define PastMood   ~[ ?* [Kau | Kaqe] ?* [Optative | Conditional] ?* |
                     ?* Ma ?* Concessive ?* ];

define PastTenseFilters [ PastFuture .o. PastMood ];

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
! progressive aspect co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.119]
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
define ProgressiveMood ~[ ?* ProgressiveAspectPostbase ?* [Optative | Conditional] ?* ]; 

define ProgressiveAspectFilters [ ProgressiveMood ];

!------------------------------------------------------------------------
! future / frustrative co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.120]
!------------------------------------------------------------------------
define FutureEvidential ~[ ?* Naagh ?* PeteFte ?* ];

define FutureMood ~[ ?* Lleqe ?* [Subordinative | Conditional    | Consequential      |
                                  Concessive    | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique |
                                  Optative      | VolitiveOfFear ] ?* ];
define FrustrativeMood ~[ ?* Yagh ?* [Consequential | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique | Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ]; 

define FutureFrustrativeFilters [ FutureEvidential .o. FutureMood .o. FrustrativeMood ];

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! evidential / imputative co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.120-121]
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
define EvidentialMood ~[ ?* PeteFte ?* [Subordinative      | Conditional    | Consequential |
                                        Concessive         | Contemporative | Participial   |
                                        ParticipialOblique | Optative       | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define ImputativeMood ~[ ?* Ni ?* [Conditional | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique | Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define EvidentialImputativeFilters [ EvidentialMood .o. ImputativeMood ];


!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 3. FILTER COMPOSITION
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
define Filters [ NegativeFilters             .o.
	             ModalFilters                .o.
                 PastTenseFilters            .o.
                 ProgressiveAspectFilters    .o.
                 FutureFrustrativeFilters    .o.
                 EvidentialImputativeFilters
               ];


!=======
! RULES
!=======

define Lowercase [ A:a | I:i | U:u | E:e |
                   P:p | T:t | K:k | Q:q |
                   L:l | Z:z | Y:y | R:r |
                   G:g | W:w | S:s | F:f |
                   S:s | M:m | N:n | "V":v ] ?* | ?* ;

define Uppercase [ a:A | i:I | u:U | e:E |
                   p:P | t:T | k:K | q:Q |
                   l:L | z:Z | y:Y | r:R |
                   g:G | w:W | s:S | f:F |
                   s:S | m:M | n:N | v:"V" ] ?* | ?* ;

define AsciiArrow "(N→N)" (->) "(N->N)" ,,
                  "(N→V)" (->) "(N->V)" ,,
                  "(V→V)" (->) "(V->V)" ,,
                  "(V→N)" (->) "(V->N)" ;
	               

!------------------------------
! E-DROPPING AND HOPPING RULES
!------------------------------
